Utah statutes.
41-1a-1504.   Effect of ownership transfer on ownership of data.

(1)  Event data on a motor vehicle event data recorder does not become the property of:

(a)  an insurer solely because the insurer succeeds in ownership of a motor vehicle as a result of an accident; or

(b)  a subsequent purchaser solely because the subsequent purchaser becomes the new owner of the motor vehicle.

(2)  An insurer or lessor of a motor vehicle may not require an owner to consent to the retrieval or use of the data on a motor vehicle event data recorder as a condition of providing the policy or lease.



Enacted by Chapter 189, 2013 General Session

